Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 162.375 is amended to read:
162.375. (1) A person commits the  crime of initiating a false report if the person knowingly ini-
tiates a false alarm or report that is transmitted to  a fire department, law enforcement agency or
other organization that deals with emergencies involving danger to life or property.
(2)(a) Initiating a false report is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, initiating  a false report is a Class
C felony if the false report is of such nature that the person initiating the  report inten-
tionally causes the deployment of an enhanced law enforcement response and recklessly
causes serious physical injury to or the death of another person as a result of  the enhanced
law enforcement response.
(3) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall classify  initiating a false report as
described in subsection (2)(b) of this section as a person felony under the rules  of the com-
mission.
[(3)(a)] (4) The court shall include in the sentence of any person convicted under this section  a
requirement that  the person repay the costs incurred in responding to and investigating the false
report.
[(b) If the response to the false report involved the deployment of a  law enforcement special weap-
ons and tactics (SWAT) team or  a similar law enforcement group, the court shall impose, and may not
suspend, a term of incarceration of: ]
[(A) At least 10 days. ]
[(B) At least 30 days if the deployment resulted in death  or serious physical injury to another
person.]
(5) As used in  this section, “enhanced law enforcement response” means a response by
a law enforcement agency  that, based on the information received, involves the dispatch of
two or more officers or units and one or more of the following:
(a) The dispatch of specialized or tactical teams;
(b) The establishment of a perimeter, the evacuation of bystanders  or restriction of
public access;
Enrolled House Bill 4151 (HB 4151-A) Page 1
(c) The use or deployment of specialized equipment, including armored  vehicles, breach-
ing tools or aircraft; or
(d) The initiation of emergency procedures such  as a shelter-in-place directive or the
activation of rapid response protocols.
Passed by House February 19, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4151 (HB 4151-A) Page 2